Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.260

Expiration of licenses—Authority under commodity sales representative license—Notification of changes.

(1) The license of a commodity broker-dealer or commodity sales representative expires on December 31 of the year for which issued or at such other time as the administrator may by rule prescribe.

(2) The license of a commodity sales representative is only effective with respect to transactions effected as an employee or representative on behalf of the commodity broker-dealer or issuer for whom the commodity sales representative is licensed.

(3) When a commodity sales representative begins or terminates association with a commodity broker-dealer or issuer, or begins or terminates activities which make that person a commodity sales representative, the commodity sales representative and the former commodity broker-dealer or issuer on whose behalf the commodity sales representative was acting shall notify promptly the administrator or the administrator's designee.

[ 1986 c 14 s 27.]